Wisconsin, session 2025, SB600.
do enact as follows:SB600,11Section 1. 16.004 (25) of the statutes is created to read:SB600,2,10216.004 (25) Qualifying scholarship granting organizations. The 3department shall annually submit to the U.S. secretary of the treasury and publish 4on the department’s website a list of scholarship granting organizations that meet 5the requirements under 26 USC 25F and are located in this state. The department 6shall certify to the U.S. secretary of the treasury the department’s authority to 7submit the list on behalf of the state and comply with any other requirement under 826 USC 25F, including any regulations or guidance issued under 26 USC 25F (h), to 9ensure that the state is eligible to participate in taxable years beginning after 10December 31, 2026.SB600,211Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.SB600,2,1512(1) Election. By no later than July 1, 2026, the governor shall elect to 13participate in the federal tax credit program established under 26 USC 25F for 14individuals who make qualified contributions to scholarship granting organizations 15beginning with the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026.SB600,2,1616